Utah statutes.
75-2-1301.   Transitional provisions.

(1)  On July 1, 1998:

(a)  Any act done in any proceeding and any right accrued before July 1, 1998, is not impaired by the provisions of this title.

(b)  If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred on the expiration of a prescribed period of time which has commenced to run by the provisions of any statute before July 1, 1997, the provisions shall remain in force with respect to that right.

(2)  Any rule of construction or presumption provided in these provisions applies to governing instruments executed before July 1, 1997, unless there is a finding of a contrary intent.

